Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-196.01
Board of Parole; determination regarding parole; requirements.

(1) This section applies to the board whenever it makes a determination of whether to grant or deny parole, sets the conditions of parole, or determines the sanctions for a violation of parole.

(2) The board shall serve as an impartial, neutral, and objective decisionmaker and shall be insulated from undue influences of specific ideological views and positions and from predetermined conceptions of the desired outcomes of proceedings before the board.

(3) If the board collaborates with or receives input from other entities within the criminal justice system, the board shall do so in a manner that respects and reinforces impartiality, neutrality, and objectivity.

(4) The board shall consider all evidence regarding a committed offender in an impartial, neutral, and objective manner.

(5) The board shall not recommend or require that a committed offender complete or participate in any program or treatment not included in the offender's department-approved personalized program plan created under section 83-1,107.

(6) The board shall not make recommendations to the department regarding specific custody levels for committed offenders.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 39.
July 19, 2024